Washington statutes.
RCW 39.62.030

Facsimile seal—Authorized—Legal effect.

When the seal of this state or any of its departments, agencies, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, junior taxing districts, school districts, or other instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions is required in the execution of a public security or instrument of payment, the authorized officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, stamped or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

[ 1969 c 86 s 3.]